Utah statutes.
11-13-201.   Joint exercise of power, privilege, or authority by public
agencies -- Relationship to the Municipal Cable Television and Public
Telecommunications Services Act.
(1) (a)  Any power, privilege, or authority exercised or capable of exercise
by a Utah public agency may be exercised and enjoyed jointly with any other
Utah public agency having the power, privilege, or authority, and jointly with
any out-of-state public agency to the extent that the laws governing the out-
of-state public agency permit such joint exercise or enjoyment.
(b)  Any agency of the state government when acting jointly with any public
agency may exercise and enjoy all of the powers, privileges, and authority
conferred by this chapter upon a public agency.
(2)  This chapter may not enlarge or expand the authority of a public agency
not authorized to offer and provide cable television services and public
telecommunications services under Title 10, Chapter 18, Municipal Cable
Television and Public Telecommunications Services Act, to offer or provide
cable television services and public telecommunications services.
